Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.045

Effect of acceptance of appointment.

On acceptance of appointment, a guardian or conservator submits to personal jurisdiction of the court in this state in any proceeding relating to the guardianship or conservatorship.

[ 2019 c 437 s 109.]